Hawaii, session 2025, HB1065.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 302L-9, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows: "(e) [Stipend] Beginning on July 1, 2023, stipend funds repaid by a stipend recipient pursuant to subsection (d) shall be deposited into [Hawaii early childhood educator] the early learning special fund established pursuant to section [302L-10.] 302L-5." SECTION 2. Section 302L-10, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is repealed. ["[§302L-10]  Hawaii early childhood educator special fund.  There is established within the state treasury the Hawaii early childhood educator special fund, to be administered by the office, into which shall be deposited all moneys received by the office pursuant to section 302L-9(e).  Moneys in the fund shall be used for the Hawaii early childhood educator stipend program established pursuant to section 302L-9."] SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST